Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3108
Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program; purposes.

The purposes of the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program are to:

(1) Retain teachers in the accredited school districts, educational service units, and private schools or approved private schools of Nebraska;

(2) Improve the skills of existing teachers in Nebraska through the graduate education or endorsement programs of Nebraska's postsecondary educational institutions; and

(3) Establish a loan contract that requires a borrower to continue employment as a teacher in this state after graduation from an eligible graduate or endorsement program.

Laws 2009, LB547, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2022, § 79-8,137.02;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 20.
July 1, 2024